Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Resource Recovery Road Projects

175.640.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky determines as a legislative finding of fact that the economy of the Commonwealth is, to a major degree, dependent upon the severance and production of coal, which is the most abundant and valuable mineral resource of Kentucky; that there is a serious shortage of transportation facilities for the transportation of coal from mines to market; that many of the roads, bridges and highways situated in the coal-producing areas of the Commonwealth are obsolete and inadequate for the uses to which they are subjected, and have, in many cases deteriorated to the point where their use is hazardous and represents a potential threat to the safety and welfare of the traveling public; and that the shortage of modern, heavy-duty road systems in such areas is seriously retarding the continued economic growth of the Commonwealth. The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky further determines as a legislative finding of fact that the construction and financing of resource recovery roads through the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky utilizing coal severance tax allocations for the amortization of resource recovery road revenue bonds issued to provide funds to construct such roads will preserve and enhance the economic viability of the Commonwealth, will protect and enhance the safety, health, convenience and general welfare of the traveling public, and will therefore constitute the performance of essential governmental and public purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 259, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Whiteside and Buechel, Kentucky Taxation, 65 Ky. L.J. 425 (1976-77).

175.650.
Definitions for KRS 175.640 to 175.690.

As used in KRS

175.640

to

175.690

, and as applied to the financing of resource recovery roads by the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky, the following words and phrases shall have the following respective meanings, unless another or different meaning or intent shall be clearly indicated by the context.

“Authority” shall mean the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky duly organized and existing pursuant to the provisions of KRS

175.410

to

175.990

, inclusive.

“Bonds” or “resource recovery road revenue bonds” shall mean resource recovery road revenue bonds of the authority issued under the provisions of KRS

175.640

to

175.690

.

“Cabinet” shall mean the Transportation Cabinet of Kentucky or, if said cabinet shall be abolished, the cabinet, board, body, department, or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers vested in the cabinet shall be given or transferred by law.

“Resource recovery road project” or “project” shall mean any express highway or superhighway, or such part or parts thereof, as may be constructed and financed under the provisions of KRS

175.640

to

175.690

which shall be designed and constructed to serve as a modern, heavy-duty motorway facility capable of carrying in normal operations vehicles designed for the transportation of coal severed and produced in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, which road shall also be designed to serve the traveling public, including all bridges, tunnels, overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, entrance plazas, approaches, connecting highways, tollhouses (if any), service stations, garages, restaurants, and administration, storage, or other buildings and facilities which the authority may deem necessary for the operation of such resource recovery road project, together with all property, rights, easements, and interests which may be acquired by the authority or by the cabinet for the construction or the operation of such project.

All words and phrases which are defined and used in KRS

175.410

to

175.990

, inclusive, shall have the same meaning or meanings when used in KRS

175.640

to

175.690

, except that the words and phrases “turnpike project” or “project” as used in said identified sections shall mean and refer to resource recovery road projects constructed and financed pursuant to KRS

175.640

to

175.690

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 259, § 2.

175.660.
Authority with respect to resource recovery road projects.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

175.640

to

175.690

, the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky may initiate, plan, implement, acquire, construct and finance resource recovery road projects utilizing and employing all of the authority, rights and procedures granted to the authority by KRS

175.410

to

175.990

, inclusive.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 259, § 3.

175.670.
Authorization to contract for and lease resource recovery road projects — Bonds.

In order to provide for the construction of resource recovery road projects, the authority is hereby authorized and empowered under and pursuant to the terms and provisions of a written agreement or agreements with the cabinet to construct, finance, maintain, repair and operate resource recovery road projects, to lease such projects to the cabinet, and to issue resource recovery road revenue bonds of the authority to finance such projects. In the planning, construction and financing of any resource recovery road project, the authority and the cabinet shall, subject to the provisions of KRS

175.640

to

175.690

, have and use all authority, procedures and rights provided by the provisions of KRS

175.410

to

175.990

, inclusive.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 259, § 4.

175.680.
Revenue bonds.

In the event that the authority and the cabinet shall undertake the planning, construction and financing of any resource recovery road project, it may be provided in connection with such financing that resource recovery road revenue bonds issued in respect of any such project shall be secured solely by income and revenues derived from the leasing by the authority of any such project to the cabinet, and shall not be secured by a pledge of any motor fuel taxes and surtaxes collected by the Commonwealth on gasoline and other motor fuels consumed by vehicles utilizing such resource recovery road project.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 259, § 5.

175.690.
Use of funds.

All funds credited to the state transportation fund (road fund), from severance tax collection, shall be used for the purposes of paying the annual lease rental payments to the Kentucky Turnpike Authority for resource recovery road projects. Any funds deposited to the credit of the transportation fund (road fund) in excess of the amount required for the annual lease payments shall revert at the close of the fiscal year to the credit of the general fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 259, § 6.